Alabama, session 2026rs, HB459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-34-84.20, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-34-84.20
(a) In addition to all other fees and costs provided by
law, a special transaction fee in an amount determined by the
Henry County Commission, but not exceeding five dollars ($5),
shall be paid to the Henry County Judge of Probate when any
public business is transacted in his or her office.
(b) The special additional transaction fees shall be
collected by the judge of probate and deposited no later than
the 20th day of the month following collection as follows:
(1) The first two dollars ($2) into a special fund in
the Henry County Judge of Probate office to be used at the
discretion of the judge of probate for the costs of
maintaining, preserving, and upgrading the records and
recording equipment and other services necessary for the
improvement of the office of the judge of probate.
(2) Any amount in excess of two dollars ($2) into the
Henry County General Fund.
(c) The judge of probate may transfer funds from the
special fund in the Henry County Judge of Probate office to
the Henry County General Fund at his or her discretion."
Page 1

the Henry County General Fund at his or her discretion."
HB459 Enrolled
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB459 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3